Illinois, session 104th, HB871.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-1061)8    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 9Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare 10services when not available through other public or private 11child care or program facilities.12    (a) For purposes of this Section:13        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 14    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 15    persons under age 21 who:16            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 17        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 18        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 19        court; or20            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 21        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 22        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 23        served by continuing that care, service and training   HB0871 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical 2        disability, social adjustment or any combination 3        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 4        educational or vocational training program.5        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 6    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 7    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 8    families.9        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 10    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 11    the following purposes:12            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety 13        and welfare of children, including homeless, 14        dependent, or neglected children;15            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 16        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 17        exploitation, or delinquency of children;18            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 19        children from their families by identifying family 20        problems, assisting families in resolving their 21        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 22        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 23        possible when the child can be cared for at home 24        without endangering the child's health and safety;25            (D) restoring to their families children who have 26        been removed, by the provision of services to the   HB0871 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        child and the families when the child can be cared for 2        at home without endangering the child's health and 3        safety;4            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 5        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 6        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 7        safe, possible, or appropriate;8            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 9        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 10        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 11        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 12        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 13        placement made is the best available placement to 14        provide permanency for the child;15            (G) (blank);16            (H) (blank); and17            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 18        that provide separate living quarters for children 19        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 20        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 21        last year of high school education or vocational 22        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 23        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 24        child care facility. The Department is not required to 25        place or maintain children:26                (i) who are in a foster home, or  HB0871 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1                (ii) who are persons with a developmental 2            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 3            Developmental Disabilities Code, or4                (iii) who are female children who are 5            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or6                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 7            provide separate living quarters for children 18 8            years of age and older and for children under 18 9            years of age.10    (b) (Blank).11    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 12process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 13submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 14receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 15use, and developmental disability services from the Department 16of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 17Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 18data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 19and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 20and placement availability. 21    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to 22this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 23and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 24rules, including without limitation the federal Health 25Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 26Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental   HB0871 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 2    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 3tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 4improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 5that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 6throughout the State to children requiring such services.7    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for 8any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 9Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 10contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 11disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 12by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 13operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 14disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 15or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 16and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 17bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 18shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 19during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 20Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 21respect to the following: payments to local public agencies 22for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 23Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 24Section 17a-4.25    (e) (Blank).26    (f) (Blank).  HB0871 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations 2concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 3goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, 4family reunification, and adoption, including, but not limited 5to:6        (1) adoption;7        (2) foster care;8        (3) family counseling;9        (4) protective services;10        (5) (blank);11        (6) homemaker service;12        (7) return of runaway children;13        (8) (blank);14        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 15    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 16    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 17    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; and18        (10) interstate services.19    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 20include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 21of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies 22or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 23use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 24approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 25to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 26purpose of identifying children and adults who should be   HB0871 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately 2licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 3disorder treatment.4    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 5program or facility within or available to the Department for 6a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 7adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the 8youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 9individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 10The plan may be developed within the Department or through 11purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 12within its statutory authority to do.13    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 14State and shall include but not be limited to the following 15services:16        (1) case management;17        (2) homemakers;18        (3) counseling;19        (4) parent education;20        (5) day care; and21        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy.22    In addition, the following services may be made available 23to assess and meet the needs of children and families:24        (1) comprehensive family-based services;25        (2) assessments;26        (3) respite care; and  HB0871 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        (4) in-home health services.2    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 3services it makes available to children or families or for 4which it refers children or families.5    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 6assistance and education assistance grants, and shall 7establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 8grants, to persons who adopt children with physical or mental 9disabilities, children who are older, or other hard-to-place 10children who (i) immediately prior to their adoption were 11youth in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 12assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 13available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 14dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 15been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 16died. The Department may continue to provide financial 17assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 18determined eligible for financial assistance under this 19subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the 20child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 21of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 22parents. The Department may also provide categories of 23financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 24shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 25grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under 26Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28,   HB0871 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b14-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children 2who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 3appointment of the guardian.4    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 5needs of the child and the adoptive parents, as set forth in 6the annual assistance agreement. Special purpose grants are 7allowed where the child requires special service but such 8costs may not exceed the amounts which similar services would 9cost the Department if it were to provide or secure them as 10guardian of the child.11    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 12inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 13garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 14a judgment or debt.15    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 16of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 17either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 18outside of the State of Illinois.19    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any 20child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 21dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 22or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.23    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 24services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 25Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including 26adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services   HB0871 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in 2substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 3in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 4welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 5(iii) to maintain an adoptive placement. Family preservation 6services shall only be offered when doing so will not endanger 7the children's health or safety. With respect to children who 8are in substitute care pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 91987, family preservation services shall not be offered if a 10goal other than those of subdivisions (A), (B), or (B-1) of 11subsection (2) of Section 2-28 of that Act has been set, except 12that reunification services may be offered as provided in 13paragraph (F) of subsection (2) of Section 2-28 of that Act. 14Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to create a 15private right of action or claim on the part of any individual 16or child welfare agency, except that when a child is the 17subject of an action under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act 18of 1987 and the child's service plan calls for services to 19facilitate achievement of the permanency goal, the court 20hearing the action under Article II of the Juvenile Court Act 21of 1987 may order the Department to provide the services set 22out in the plan, if those services are not provided with 23reasonable promptness and if those services are available.24    The Department shall notify the child and the child's 25family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 26family preservation services as identified in the service   HB0871 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for 2services as soon as the report is determined to be 3"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 4family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse 5or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 6investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 7Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 8willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 9investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 10child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 11child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 12services available from other agencies in the community, even 13if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 14in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 15subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 16child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 17voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 18child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an 19alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 20"differential response program" provided for in subsection 21(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 22Reporting Act.23    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 24children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for 25care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 26as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor   HB0871 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court 2Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 3be committed to the Department by any court without the 4approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the 5effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 62017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 7Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 8adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 9or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 10less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 11Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 12for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 13exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 14minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 15to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 162-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 172017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 18Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 19adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 20or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 21less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 22Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 23for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 24exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 25minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 26to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section   HB0871 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b12-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis 2exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 3or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 4circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of 5delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 6attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 7the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 8hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 9release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 10    As soon as is possible after August 7, 2009 (the effective 11date of Public Act 96-134), the Department shall develop and 12implement a special program of family preservation services to 13support intact, foster, and adoptive families who are 14experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 15stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 16pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 17that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 18safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 19family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused 20and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 21the child or family to services available from other agencies 22in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 23home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 24future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 25of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall 26develop and implement a public information campaign to alert   HB0871 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1health and social service providers and the general public 2about these special family preservation services. The nature 3and scope of the services offered and the number of families 4served under the special program implemented under this 5paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the 6Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 7"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 8a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 9Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 10edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 11Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.12    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 13interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 14most permanent living arrangement as soon as is practically 15possible. To achieve this goal, the General Assembly directs 16the Department of Children and Family Services to conduct 17concurrent planning so that permanency may occur at the 18earliest opportunity. Permanent living arrangements may 19include prevention of placement of a child outside the home of 20the family when the child can be cared for at home without 21endangering the child's health or safety; reunification with 22the family, when safe and appropriate, if temporary placement 23is necessary; or movement of the child toward the most 24permanent living arrangement and permanent legal status.25    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 26respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in   HB0871 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety 2shall be the paramount concern.3    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 4shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 5prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 6child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 7reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 8occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 9Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 10where the Department believes that further reunification 11services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 12the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 13The Department is not required to provide further 14reunification services after such a finding.15    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be 16made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 17best interests. At the time of placement, consideration should 18also be given so that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 19placement made is the best available placement to provide 20permanency for the child.21    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 22planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 23shall consider the following factors when determining 24appropriateness of concurrent planning:25        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;26        (2) the past history of the family;  HB0871 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by 2    the family;3        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;4        (5) the foster parents' willingness to work with the 5    family to reunite;6        (6) the willingness and ability of the foster family 7    to provide an adoptive home or long-term placement;8        (7) the age of the child;9        (8) placement of siblings.10    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 11child if:12        (1) it has received a written consent to such 13    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 14    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 15    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 16    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 17    or18        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 19    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 20    located.21If the child is found in the child's residence without a 22parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 23Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 24temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 25Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 26guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a   HB0871 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health 2and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 3relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 4child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 5a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 6such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and 7resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 8home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 9follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 105-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.11    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 12and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have 13pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 14Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 15custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 16Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 17acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 18limited custody, the Department, during the period of 19temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 20judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 215-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 22authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 23of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 24the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.25    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 26custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical   HB0871 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1examination.2    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 3temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 4the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 5Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 6the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child. 7The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 810 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 9the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 10Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 11Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 12the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within 13the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 14custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 15later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 16the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 17temporary custody of the child shall terminate.18    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 19age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 20that cares for children who are in need of secure living 21arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 22determination is made by the facility director and the 23Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 24facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 25of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 26subject to placement in a correctional facility operated   HB0871 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 2unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 3of the Department before being subject to placement in a 4correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 5has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.6    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of 7age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 8the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 9preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 10child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 11placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 12clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed 13in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 14Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 15those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 16guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 17Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 18facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 19of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 20maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 21dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 22However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 23where children require specialized care and treatment for 24problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 25social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 26facilities for the placement of such children are not   HB0871 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in 2this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 3be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 4garnishment or otherwise.5    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 6welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve 7sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 8minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 9subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 101987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 11provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 12yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have 13responsibility for the development and delivery of services 14under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 15under this Section through the Department of Children and 16Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 17Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 18shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 19an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 20the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 21homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 22youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 23Department shall continue child welfare services under this 24Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 25of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 26self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan.   HB0871 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1The Department of Children and Family Services shall create 2clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 3child welfare services under this Section and how such 4services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 5Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 6disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall 7adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 8minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 9independent adults. 10    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 11review and appeal process for children and families who 12request or receive child welfare services from the Department. 13Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 14agencies, and foster families with whom those youth are 15placed, shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal 16rights as children and families in the case of placement by the 17Department, including the right to an initial review of a 18private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 19ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 20youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 21and foster families. The Department shall accept for 22administrative review and an appeal hearing a complaint made 23by (i) a child or foster family concerning a decision 24following an initial review by a private child welfare agency 25or (ii) a prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation 26of subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision   HB0871 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be 2conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 3current foster home placement is necessary and appropriate 4under Section 2-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not 5constitute a judicial determination on the merits of an 6administrative appeal, filed by a former foster parent, 7involving a change of placement decision.8    (p) (Blank).9    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 10for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 11money or other property which is received on behalf of such 12children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 13or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of 14the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 155.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 16under Section 5.46.17    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 18interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 19institutions for children for whom the Department is legally 20responsible and who have been determined eligible for 21Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 22allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 23parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 24Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 25miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall 26be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance   HB0871 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1with this subsection.2    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 3Department shall:4        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 5    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 6    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 7    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 8    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 9    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 10    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 11    account for any purpose.12        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 13    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care 14    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 15    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 16    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 17    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 18    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 19    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of 20    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.21        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 22    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 23    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 24    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 25    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.26    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations   HB0871 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to 2the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 3who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 4hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 5of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 6of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 7Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 8confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 9of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 10adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 11such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 12agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 13Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the 14confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 15of the child.16    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 17establish and implement a program to reimburse Department and 18private child welfare agency foster parents licensed by the 19Department of Children and Family Services for damages 20sustained by the foster parents as a result of the malicious or 21negligent acts of foster children, as well as providing third 22party coverage for such foster parents with regard to actions 23of foster children to other individuals. Such coverage will be 24secondary to the foster parent liability insurance policy, if 25applicable. The program shall be funded through appropriations 26from the General Revenue Fund, specifically designated for   HB0871 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1such purposes.2    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 3investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 4as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 5Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:6        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 7    directs the Department to perform such services; and8        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 9    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 10    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 11    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 12    party is financially able to pay.13    The Department shall provide written notification to the 14court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 15and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 16The Department shall send to the court information related to 17the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 18determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 19court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.20    (u) In addition to other information that must be 21provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 22prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 23home, group home, or child care institution, or in a relative 24home, the Department shall provide to the prospective adoptive 25parent or parents or other caretaker:26        (1) available detailed information concerning the   HB0871 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    child's educational and health history, copies of 2    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 3    information), a history of the child's previous 4    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 5    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 6    location of any previous caretaker;7        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 8    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 9    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 10    and11        (3) information containing details of the child's 12    individualized educational plan when the child is 13    receiving special education services.14    The caretaker shall be informed of any known social or 15behavioral information (including, but not limited to, 16criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 17abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to 18care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 19in the home. The Department may prepare a written summary of 20the information required by this paragraph, which may be 21provided to the foster or prospective adoptive parent in 22advance of a placement. The foster or prospective adoptive 23parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 24in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 25placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 26information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently   HB0871 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1provide the information in writing as required by this 2subsection. 3    The information described in this subsection shall be 4provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 5time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 6of written information, the Department shall provide such 7information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 8after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 9prospective adoptive parent or parents or other caretaker a 10signed verification of receipt of the information provided. 11Within 10 business days after placement, the Department shall 12provide to the child's guardian ad litem a copy of the 13information provided to the prospective adoptive parent or 14parents or other caretaker. The information provided to the 15prospective adoptive parent or parents or other caretaker 16shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at the 17supervisory level. 18    (u-5) Effective July 1, 1995, only foster care placements 19licensed as foster family homes pursuant to the Child Care Act 20of 1969 shall be eligible to receive foster care payments from 21the Department. Relative caregivers who, as of July 1, 1995, 22were approved pursuant to approved relative placement rules 23previously promulgated by the Department at 89 Ill. Adm. Code 24335 and had submitted an application for licensure as a foster 25family home may continue to receive foster care payments only 26until the Department determines that they may be licensed as a   HB0871 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1foster family home or that their application for licensure is 2denied or until September 30, 1995, whichever occurs first.3    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 4information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 5Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 6and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 7of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines 8the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 9Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 10of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 11Department shall provide for interactive computerized 12communication and processing equipment that permits direct 13on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's central 14criminal history data repository. The Department shall comply 15with all certification requirements and provide certified 16operators who have been trained by personnel from the Illinois 17State Police. In addition, one Office of the Inspector General 18investigator shall have training in the use of the criminal 19history information access system and have access to the 20terminal. The Department of Children and Family Services and 21its employees shall abide by rules and regulations established 22by the Illinois State Police relating to the access and 23dissemination of this information.24    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child, 25the Department shall conduct a criminal records background 26check of the prospective foster or adoptive parent, including   HB0871 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1fingerprint-based checks of national crime information 2databases. Final approval for placement shall not be granted 3if the record check reveals a felony conviction for child 4abuse or neglect, for spousal abuse, for a crime against 5children, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, 6sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical 7assault or battery, or if there is a felony conviction for 8physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 9within the past 5 years.10    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child, 11the Department shall check its child abuse and neglect 12registry for information concerning prospective foster and 13adoptive parents, and any adult living in the home. If any 14prospective foster or adoptive parent or other adult living in 15the home has resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, 16the Department shall request a check of that other state's 17child abuse and neglect registry. 18    (w) Within 120 days of August 20, 1995 (the effective date 19of Public Act 89-392), the Department shall prepare and submit 20to the Governor and the General Assembly, a written plan for 21the development of in-state licensed secure child care 22facilities that care for children who are in need of secure 23living arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being. 24For purposes of this subsection, secure care facility shall 25mean a facility that is designed and operated to ensure that 26all entrances and exits from the facility, a building or a   HB0871 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1distinct part of the building, are under the exclusive control 2of the staff of the facility, whether or not the child has the 3freedom of movement within the perimeter of the facility, 4building, or distinct part of the building. The plan shall 5include descriptions of the types of facilities that are 6needed in Illinois; the cost of developing these secure care 7facilities; the estimated number of placements; the potential 8cost savings resulting from the movement of children currently 9out-of-state who are projected to be returned to Illinois; the 10necessary geographic distribution of these facilities in 11Illinois; and a proposed timetable for development of such 12facilities.13    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 14checks to determine the financial history of children placed 15under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 161987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 17when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 18thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 19pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 20shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 21personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation 22appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 23Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 24proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.25    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 26Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives   HB0871 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1residential and educational services from the Department shall 2be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 3Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 421, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 5services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 6with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 7by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 8Improvement Act of 2004. 9    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 10information as defined as "background information" in this 11subsection and criminal history record information as defined 12in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 13Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 14employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's 15or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in 16the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 17These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 18records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 19and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 20records databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 21fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which 22shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 23shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. The 24Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 25identification, all Illinois conviction information to the 26Department of Children and Family Services.   HB0871 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    For purposes of this subsection: 2    "Background information" means all of the following: 3        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 4    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 5    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 6    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 7    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 8    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 9    a Department employee or Department applicant. 10        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of 11    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 12    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 13    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community 14    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or 15    Department applicant. 16        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 17    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 18    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 19    operated and maintained by the Department. 20    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 21employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 22Personnel System. 23    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 24conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 25contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 26an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on   HB0871 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 2entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 3provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 4and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 5contact with Department clients or client records. 6(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 7102-1014, eff. 5-27-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 81-1-24; 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 9    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-1061)10    Sec. 5. Direct child welfare services; Department of 11Children and Family Services. To provide direct child welfare 12services when not available through other public or private 13child care or program facilities.14    (a) For purposes of this Section:15        (1) "Children" means persons found within the State 16    who are under the age of 18 years. The term also includes 17    persons under age 21 who:18            (A) were committed to the Department pursuant to 19        the Juvenile Court Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 20        1987 and who continue under the jurisdiction of the 21        court; or22            (B) were accepted for care, service and training 23        by the Department prior to the age of 18 and whose best 24        interest in the discretion of the Department would be 25        served by continuing that care, service and training   HB0871 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        because of severe emotional disturbances, physical 2        disability, social adjustment or any combination 3        thereof, or because of the need to complete an 4        educational or vocational training program.5        (2) "Homeless youth" means persons found within the 6    State who are under the age of 19, are not in a safe and 7    stable living situation and cannot be reunited with their 8    families.9        (3) "Child welfare services" means public social 10    services which are directed toward the accomplishment of 11    the following purposes:12            (A) protecting and promoting the health, safety 13        and welfare of children, including homeless, 14        dependent, or neglected children;15            (B) remedying, or assisting in the solution of 16        problems which may result in, the neglect, abuse, 17        exploitation, or delinquency of children;18            (C) preventing the unnecessary separation of 19        children from their families by identifying family 20        problems, assisting families in resolving their 21        problems, and preventing the breakup of the family 22        where the prevention of child removal is desirable and 23        possible when the child can be cared for at home 24        without endangering the child's health and safety;25            (D) restoring to their families children who have 26        been removed, by the provision of services to the   HB0871 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        child and the families when the child can be cared for 2        at home without endangering the child's health and 3        safety;4            (E) placing children in suitable permanent family 5        arrangements, through guardianship or adoption, in 6        cases where restoration to the birth family is not 7        safe, possible, or appropriate;8            (F) at the time of placement, conducting 9        concurrent planning, as described in subsection (l-1) 10        of this Section, so that permanency may occur at the 11        earliest opportunity. Consideration should be given so 12        that if reunification fails or is delayed, the 13        placement made is the best available placement to 14        provide permanency for the child;15            (G) (blank);16            (H) (blank); and17            (I) placing and maintaining children in facilities 18        that provide separate living quarters for children 19        under the age of 18 and for children 18 years of age 20        and older, unless a child 18 years of age is in the 21        last year of high school education or vocational 22        training, in an approved individual or group treatment 23        program, in a licensed shelter facility, or secure 24        child care facility. The Department is not required to 25        place or maintain children:26                (i) who are in a foster home, or  HB0871 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1                (ii) who are persons with a developmental 2            disability, as defined in the Mental Health and 3            Developmental Disabilities Code, or4                (iii) who are female children who are 5            pregnant, pregnant and parenting, or parenting, or6                (iv) who are siblings, in facilities that 7            provide separate living quarters for children 18 8            years of age and older and for children under 18 9            years of age.10    (b) (Blank).11    (b-5) The Department shall adopt rules to establish a 12process for all licensed residential providers in Illinois to 13submit data as required by the Department if they contract or 14receive reimbursement for children's mental health, substance 15use, and developmental disability services from the Department 16of Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice, or the 17Department of Healthcare and Family Services. The requested 18data must include, but is not limited to, capacity, staffing, 19and occupancy data for the purpose of establishing State need 20and placement availability. 21    All information collected, shared, or stored pursuant to 22this subsection shall be handled in accordance with all State 23and federal privacy laws and accompanying regulations and 24rules, including without limitation the federal Health 25Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public 26Law 104-191) and the Mental Health and Developmental   HB0871 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1Disabilities Confidentiality Act. 2    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain 3tax-supported child welfare services and extend and seek to 4improve voluntary services throughout the State, to the end 5that services and care shall be available on an equal basis 6throughout the State to children requiring such services.7    (d) The Director may authorize advance disbursements for 8any new program initiative to any agency contracting with the 9Department. As a prerequisite for an advance disbursement, the 10contractor must post a surety bond in the amount of the advance 11disbursement and have a purchase of service contract approved 12by the Department. The Department may pay up to 2 months 13operational expenses in advance. The amount of the advance 14disbursement shall be prorated over the life of the contract 15or the remaining months of the fiscal year, whichever is less, 16and the installment amount shall then be deducted from future 17bills. Advance disbursement authorizations for new initiatives 18shall not be made to any agency after that agency has operated 19during 2 consecutive fiscal years. The requirements of this 20Section concerning advance disbursements shall not apply with 21respect to the following: payments to local public agencies 22for child day care services as authorized by Section 5a of this 23Act; and youth service programs receiving grant funds under 24Section 17a-4.25    (e) (Blank).26    (f) (Blank).  HB0871 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    (g) The Department shall establish rules and regulations 2concerning its operation of programs designed to meet the 3goals of child safety and protection, family preservation, and 4permanency, including, but not limited to:5        (1) reunification, guardianship, and adoption;6        (2) relative and licensed foster care;7        (3) family counseling;8        (4) protective services;9        (5) (blank);10        (6) homemaker service;11        (7) return of runaway children;12        (8) (blank);13        (9) placement under Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court 14    Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 4-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile 15    Court Act of 1987 in accordance with the federal Adoption 16    Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980; and17        (10) interstate services.18    Rules and regulations established by the Department shall 19include provisions for training Department staff and the staff 20of Department grantees, through contracts with other agencies 21or resources, in screening techniques to identify substance 22use disorders, as defined in the Substance Use Disorder Act, 23approved by the Department of Human Services, as a successor 24to the Department of Alcoholism and Substance Abuse, for the 25purpose of identifying children and adults who should be 26referred for an assessment at an organization appropriately   HB0871 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1licensed by the Department of Human Services for substance use 2disorder treatment.3    (h) If the Department finds that there is no appropriate 4program or facility within or available to the Department for 5a youth in care and that no licensed private facility has an 6adequate and appropriate program or none agrees to accept the 7youth in care, the Department shall create an appropriate 8individualized, program-oriented plan for such youth in care. 9The plan may be developed within the Department or through 10purchase of services by the Department to the extent that it is 11within its statutory authority to do.12    (i) Service programs shall be available throughout the 13State and shall include but not be limited to the following 14services:15        (1) case management;16        (2) homemakers;17        (3) counseling;18        (4) parent education;19        (5) day care;20        (6) emergency assistance and advocacy; and21        (7) kinship navigator and relative caregiver supports. 22    In addition, the following services may be made available 23to assess and meet the needs of children and families:24        (1) comprehensive family-based services;25        (2) assessments;26        (3) respite care; and  HB0871 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        (4) in-home health services.2    The Department shall provide transportation for any of the 3services it makes available to children or families or for 4which it refers children or families.5    (j) The Department may provide categories of financial 6assistance and education assistance grants, and shall 7establish rules and regulations concerning the assistance and 8grants, to persons who adopt or become subsidized guardians of 9children with physical or mental disabilities, children who 10are older, or other hard-to-place children who (i) immediately 11prior to their adoption or subsidized guardianship were youth 12in care or (ii) were determined eligible for financial 13assistance with respect to a prior adoption and who become 14available for adoption because the prior adoption has been 15dissolved and the parental rights of the adoptive parents have 16been terminated or because the child's adoptive parents have 17died. The Department may continue to provide financial 18assistance and education assistance grants for a child who was 19determined eligible for financial assistance under this 20subsection (j) in the interim period beginning when the 21child's adoptive parents died and ending with the finalization 22of the new adoption of the child by another adoptive parent or 23parents. The Department may also provide categories of 24financial assistance and education assistance grants, and 25shall establish rules and regulations for the assistance and 26grants, to persons appointed guardian of the person under   HB0871 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1Section 5-7 of the Juvenile Court Act or Section 2-27, 3-28, 24-25, or 5-740 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 for children 3who were youth in care for 12 months immediately prior to the 4appointment of the guardian.5    The amount of assistance may vary, depending upon the 6needs of the child and the adoptive parents or subsidized 7guardians, as set forth in the annual assistance agreement. 8Special purpose grants are allowed where the child requires 9special service but such costs may not exceed the amounts 10which similar services would cost the Department if it were to 11provide or secure them as guardian of the child.12    Any financial assistance provided under this subsection is 13inalienable by assignment, sale, execution, attachment, 14garnishment, or any other remedy for recovery or collection of 15a judgment or debt.16    (j-5) The Department shall not deny or delay the placement 17of a child for adoption if an approved family is available 18either outside of the Department region handling the case, or 19outside of the State of Illinois.20    (k) The Department shall accept for care and training any 21child who has been adjudicated neglected or abused, or 22dependent committed to it pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act 23or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.24    (l) The Department shall offer family preservation 25services, as defined in Section 8.2 of the Abused and 26Neglected Child Reporting Act, to help families, including   HB0871 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1adoptive and extended families. Family preservation services 2shall be offered (i) to prevent the placement of children in 3substitute care when the children can be cared for at home or 4in the custody of the person responsible for the children's 5welfare, (ii) to reunite children with their families, or 6(iii) to maintain an adoption or subsidized guardianship. 7Family preservation services shall only be offered when doing 8so will not endanger the children's health or safety. With 9respect to children who are in substitute care pursuant to the 10Juvenile Court Act of 1987, family preservation services shall 11not be offered if a goal other than those of subdivisions (A), 12(B), or (B-1) of subsection (2.3) of Section 2-28 of that Act 13has been set, except that reunification services may be 14offered as provided in paragraph (F) of subsection (2.3) of 15Section 2-28 of that Act. Nothing in this paragraph shall be 16construed to create a private right of action or claim on the 17part of any individual or child welfare agency, except that 18when a child is the subject of an action under Article II of 19the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and the child's service plan 20calls for services to facilitate achievement of the permanency 21goal, the court hearing the action under Article II of the 22Juvenile Court Act of 1987 may order the Department to provide 23the services set out in the plan, if those services are not 24provided with reasonable promptness and if those services are 25available.26    The Department shall notify the child and the child's   HB0871 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1family of the Department's responsibility to offer and provide 2family preservation services as identified in the service 3plan. The child and the child's family shall be eligible for 4services as soon as the report is determined to be 5"indicated". The Department may offer services to any child or 6family with respect to whom a report of suspected child abuse 7or neglect has been filed, prior to concluding its 8investigation under Section 7.12 of the Abused and Neglected 9Child Reporting Act. However, the child's or family's 10willingness to accept services shall not be considered in the 11investigation. The Department may also provide services to any 12child or family who is the subject of any report of suspected 13child abuse or neglect or may refer such child or family to 14services available from other agencies in the community, even 15if the report is determined to be unfounded, if the conditions 16in the child's or family's home are reasonably likely to 17subject the child or family to future reports of suspected 18child abuse or neglect. Acceptance of such services shall be 19voluntary. The Department may also provide services to any 20child or family after completion of a family assessment, as an 21alternative to an investigation, as provided under the 22"differential response program" provided for in subsection 23(a-5) of Section 7.4 of the Abused and Neglected Child 24Reporting Act.25    The Department may, at its discretion except for those 26children also adjudicated neglected or dependent, accept for   HB0871 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1care and training any child who has been adjudicated addicted, 2as a truant minor in need of supervision or as a minor 3requiring authoritative intervention, under the Juvenile Court 4Act or the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, but no such child shall 5be committed to the Department by any court without the 6approval of the Department. On and after January 1, 2015 (the 7effective date of Public Act 98-803) and before January 1, 82017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 9Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 10adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 11or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 12less than 16 years of age committed to the Department under 13Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 14for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 15exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a 16minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 17to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 182-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. On and after January 1, 192017, a minor charged with a criminal offense under the 20Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012 or 21adjudicated delinquent shall not be placed in the custody of 22or committed to the Department by any court, except (i) a minor 23less than 15 years of age committed to the Department under 24Section 5-710 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, (ii) a minor 25for whom an independent basis of abuse, neglect, or dependency 26exists, which must be defined by departmental rule, or (iii) a   HB0871 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1minor for whom the court has granted a supplemental petition 2to reinstate wardship pursuant to subsection (2) of Section 32-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. An independent basis 4exists when the allegations or adjudication of abuse, neglect, 5or dependency do not arise from the same facts, incident, or 6circumstances which give rise to a charge or adjudication of 7delinquency. The Department shall assign a caseworker to 8attend any hearing involving a youth in the care and custody of 9the Department who is placed on aftercare release, including 10hearings involving sanctions for violation of aftercare 11release conditions and aftercare release revocation hearings. 12    As soon as is possible, the Department shall develop and 13implement a special program of family preservation services to 14support intact, relative, foster, and adoptive families who 15are experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 16stress of caring for a child who has been diagnosed with a 17pervasive developmental disorder if the Department determines 18that those services are necessary to ensure the health and 19safety of the child. The Department may offer services to any 20family whether or not a report has been filed under the Abused 21and Neglected Child Reporting Act. The Department may refer 22the child or family to services available from other agencies 23in the community if the conditions in the child's or family's 24home are reasonably likely to subject the child or family to 25future reports of suspected child abuse or neglect. Acceptance 26of these services shall be voluntary. The Department shall   HB0871 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1develop and implement a public information campaign to alert 2health and social service providers and the general public 3about these special family preservation services. The nature 4and scope of the services offered and the number of families 5served under the special program implemented under this 6paragraph shall be determined by the level of funding that the 7Department annually allocates for this purpose. The term 8"pervasive developmental disorder" under this paragraph means 9a neurological condition, including, but not limited to, 10Asperger's Syndrome and autism, as defined in the most recent 11edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 12Disorders of the American Psychiatric Association.13    (l-1) The General Assembly recognizes that the best 14interests of the child require that the child be placed in the 15most permanent living arrangement that is an appropriate 16option for the child, consistent with the child's best 17interest, using the factors set forth in subsection (4.05) of 18Section 1-3 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 as soon as is 19practically possible. To achieve this goal, the General 20Assembly directs the Department of Children and Family 21Services to conduct concurrent planning so that permanency may 22occur at the earliest opportunity. Permanent living 23arrangements may include prevention of placement of a child 24outside the home of the family when the child can be cared for 25at home without endangering the child's health or safety; 26reunification with the family, when safe and appropriate, if   HB0871 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1temporary placement is necessary; or movement of the child 2toward the most appropriate living arrangement and legal 3status.4    When determining reasonable efforts to be made with 5respect to a child, as described in this subsection, and in 6making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety 7shall be the paramount concern.8    When a child is placed in foster care, the Department 9shall ensure and document that reasonable efforts were made to 10prevent or eliminate the need to remove the child from the 11child's home. The Department must make reasonable efforts to 12reunify the family when temporary placement of the child 13occurs unless otherwise required, pursuant to the Juvenile 14Court Act of 1987. At any time after the dispositional hearing 15where the Department believes that further reunification 16services would be ineffective, it may request a finding from 17the court that reasonable efforts are no longer appropriate. 18The Department is not required to provide further 19reunification services after such a finding.20    A decision to place a child in substitute care shall be 21made with considerations of the child's health, safety, and 22best interests. The Department shall make diligent efforts to 23place the child with a relative, document those diligent 24efforts, and document reasons for any failure or inability to 25secure such a relative placement. If the primary issue 26preventing an emergency placement of a child with a relative   HB0871 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1is a lack of resources, including, but not limited to, 2concrete goods, safety modifications, and services, the 3Department shall make diligent efforts to assist the relative 4in obtaining the necessary resources. No later than July 1, 52025, the Department shall adopt rules defining what is 6diligent and necessary in providing supports to potential 7relative placements. At the time of placement, consideration 8should also be given so that if reunification fails or is 9delayed, the placement has the potential to be an appropriate 10permanent placement for the child.11    The Department shall adopt rules addressing concurrent 12planning for reunification and permanency. The Department 13shall consider the following factors when determining 14appropriateness of concurrent planning:15        (1) the likelihood of prompt reunification;16        (2) the past history of the family;17        (3) the barriers to reunification being addressed by 18    the family;19        (4) the level of cooperation of the family;20        (4.5) the child's wishes; 21        (5) the caregivers' willingness to work with the 22    family to reunite;23        (6) the willingness and ability of the caregivers' to 24    provide a permanent placement;25        (7) the age of the child;26        (8) placement of siblings; and  HB0871 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        (9) the wishes of the parent or parents unless the 2    parental preferences are contrary to the best interests of 3    the child. 4    (m) The Department may assume temporary custody of any 5child if:6        (1) it has received a written consent to such 7    temporary custody signed by the parents of the child or by 8    the parent having custody of the child if the parents are 9    not living together or by the guardian or custodian of the 10    child if the child is not in the custody of either parent, 11    or12        (2) the child is found in the State and neither a 13    parent, guardian nor custodian of the child can be 14    located.15If the child is found in the child's residence without a 16parent, guardian, custodian, or responsible caretaker, the 17Department may, instead of removing the child and assuming 18temporary custody, place an authorized representative of the 19Department in that residence until such time as a parent, 20guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses a 21willingness and apparent ability to ensure the child's health 22and safety and resume permanent charge of the child, or until a 23relative enters the home and is willing and able to ensure the 24child's health and safety and assume charge of the child until 25a parent, guardian, or custodian enters the home and expresses 26such willingness and ability to ensure the child's safety and   HB0871 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1resume permanent charge. After a caretaker has remained in the 2home for a period not to exceed 12 hours, the Department must 3follow those procedures outlined in Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 45-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.5    The Department shall have the authority, responsibilities 6and duties that a legal custodian of the child would have 7pursuant to subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of the Juvenile 8Court Act of 1987. Whenever a child is taken into temporary 9custody pursuant to an investigation under the Abused and 10Neglected Child Reporting Act, or pursuant to a referral and 11acceptance under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 of a minor in 12limited custody, the Department, during the period of 13temporary custody and before the child is brought before a 14judicial officer as required by Section 2-9, 3-11, 4-8, or 155-415 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, shall have the 16authority, responsibilities and duties that a legal custodian 17of the child would have under subsection (9) of Section 1-3 of 18the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.19    The Department shall ensure that any child taken into 20custody is scheduled for an appointment for a medical 21examination.22    A parent, guardian, or custodian of a child in the 23temporary custody of the Department who would have custody of 24the child if the child were not in the temporary custody of the 25Department may deliver to the Department a signed request that 26the Department surrender the temporary custody of the child.   HB0871 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1The Department may retain temporary custody of the child for 210 days after the receipt of the request, during which period 3the Department may cause to be filed a petition pursuant to the 4Juvenile Court Act of 1987. If a petition is so filed, the 5Department shall retain temporary custody of the child until 6the court orders otherwise. If a petition is not filed within 7the 10-day period, the child shall be surrendered to the 8custody of the requesting parent, guardian, or custodian not 9later than the expiration of the 10-day period, at which time 10the authority and duties of the Department with respect to the 11temporary custody of the child shall terminate.12    (m-1) The Department may place children under 18 years of 13age in a secure child care facility licensed by the Department 14that cares for children who are in need of secure living 15arrangements for their health, safety, and well-being after a 16determination is made by the facility director and the 17Director or the Director's designate prior to admission to the 18facility subject to Section 2-27.1 of the Juvenile Court Act 19of 1987. This subsection (m-1) does not apply to a child who is 20subject to placement in a correctional facility operated 21pursuant to Section 3-15-2 of the Unified Code of Corrections, 22unless the child is a youth in care who was placed in the care 23of the Department before being subject to placement in a 24correctional facility and a court of competent jurisdiction 25has ordered placement of the child in a secure care facility.26    (n) The Department may place children under 18 years of   HB0871 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1age in licensed child care facilities when in the opinion of 2the Department, appropriate services aimed at family 3preservation have been unsuccessful and cannot ensure the 4child's health and safety or are unavailable and such 5placement would be for their best interest. Payment for board, 6clothing, care, training and supervision of any child placed 7in a licensed child care facility may be made by the 8Department, by the parents or guardians of the estates of 9those children, or by both the Department and the parents or 10guardians, except that no payments shall be made by the 11Department for any child placed in a licensed child care 12facility for board, clothing, care, training, and supervision 13of such a child that exceed the average per capita cost of 14maintaining and of caring for a child in institutions for 15dependent or neglected children operated by the Department. 16However, such restriction on payments does not apply in cases 17where children require specialized care and treatment for 18problems of severe emotional disturbance, physical disability, 19social adjustment, or any combination thereof and suitable 20facilities for the placement of such children are not 21available at payment rates within the limitations set forth in 22this Section. All reimbursements for services delivered shall 23be absolutely inalienable by assignment, sale, attachment, or 24garnishment or otherwise.25    (n-1) The Department shall provide or authorize child 26welfare services, aimed at assisting minors to achieve   HB0871 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1sustainable self-sufficiency as independent adults, for any 2minor eligible for the reinstatement of wardship pursuant to 3subsection (2) of Section 2-33 of the Juvenile Court Act of 41987, whether or not such reinstatement is sought or allowed, 5provided that the minor consents to such services and has not 6yet attained the age of 21. The Department shall have 7responsibility for the development and delivery of services 8under this Section. An eligible youth may access services 9under this Section through the Department of Children and 10Family Services or by referral from the Department of Human 11Services. Youth participating in services under this Section 12shall cooperate with the assigned case manager in developing 13an agreement identifying the services to be provided and how 14the youth will increase skills to achieve self-sufficiency. A 15homeless shelter is not considered appropriate housing for any 16youth receiving child welfare services under this Section. The 17Department shall continue child welfare services under this 18Section to any eligible minor until the minor becomes 21 years 19of age, no longer consents to participate, or achieves 20self-sufficiency as identified in the minor's service plan. 21The Department of Children and Family Services shall create 22clear, readable notice of the rights of former foster youth to 23child welfare services under this Section and how such 24services may be obtained. The Department of Children and 25Family Services and the Department of Human Services shall 26disseminate this information statewide. The Department shall   HB0871 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1adopt regulations describing services intended to assist 2minors in achieving sustainable self-sufficiency as 3independent adults. 4    (o) The Department shall establish an administrative 5review and appeal process for children and families who 6request or receive child welfare services from the Department. 7Youth in care who are placed by private child welfare 8agencies, and caregivers with whom those youth are placed, 9shall be afforded the same procedural and appeal rights as 10children and families in the case of placement by the 11Department, including the right to an initial review of a 12private agency decision by that agency. The Department shall 13ensure that any private child welfare agency, which accepts 14youth in care for placement, affords those rights to children 15and caregivers with whom those children are placed. The 16Department shall accept for administrative review and an 17appeal hearing a complaint made by (i) a child or caregiver 18with whom the child is placed concerning a decision following 19an initial review by a private child welfare agency or (ii) a 20prospective adoptive parent who alleges a violation of 21subsection (j-5) of this Section. An appeal of a decision 22concerning a change in the placement of a child shall be 23conducted in an expedited manner. A court determination that a 24current placement is necessary and appropriate under Section 252-28 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 does not constitute a 26judicial determination on the merits of an administrative   HB0871 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1appeal, filed by a former caregiver, involving a change of 2placement decision. No later than July 1, 2025, the Department 3shall adopt rules to develop a reconsideration process to 4review: a denial of certification of a relative, a denial of 5placement with a relative, and a denial of visitation with an 6identified relative. Rules shall include standards and 7criteria for reconsideration that incorporate the best 8interests of the child under subsection (4.05) of Section 1-3 9of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987, address situations where 10multiple relatives seek certification, and provide that all 11rules regarding placement changes shall be followed. The rules 12shall outline the essential elements of each form used in the 13implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this 14amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 15    (p) (Blank).16    (q) The Department may receive and use, in their entirety, 17for the benefit of children any gift, donation, or bequest of 18money or other property which is received on behalf of such 19children, or any financial benefits to which such children are 20or may become entitled while under the jurisdiction or care of 21the Department, except that the benefits described in Section 225.46 must be used and conserved consistent with the provisions 23under Section 5.46.24    The Department shall set up and administer no-cost, 25interest-bearing accounts in appropriate financial 26institutions for children for whom the Department is legally   HB0871 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1responsible and who have been determined eligible for 2Veterans' Benefits, Social Security benefits, assistance 3allotments from the armed forces, court ordered payments, 4parental voluntary payments, Supplemental Security Income, 5Railroad Retirement payments, Black Lung benefits, or other 6miscellaneous payments. Interest earned by each account shall 7be credited to the account, unless disbursed in accordance 8with this subsection.9    In disbursing funds from children's accounts, the 10Department shall:11        (1) Establish standards in accordance with State and 12    federal laws for disbursing money from children's 13    accounts. In all circumstances, the Department's 14    Guardianship Administrator or the Guardianship 15    Administrator's designee must approve disbursements from 16    children's accounts. The Department shall be responsible 17    for keeping complete records of all disbursements for each 18    account for any purpose.19        (2) Calculate on a monthly basis the amounts paid from 20    State funds for the child's board and care, medical care 21    not covered under Medicaid, and social services; and 22    utilize funds from the child's account, as covered by 23    regulation, to reimburse those costs. Monthly, 24    disbursements from all children's accounts, up to 1/12 of 25    $13,000,000, shall be deposited by the Department into the 26    General Revenue Fund and the balance over 1/12 of   HB0871 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    $13,000,000 into the DCFS Children's Services Fund.2        (3) Maintain any balance remaining after reimbursing 3    for the child's costs of care, as specified in item (2). 4    The balance shall accumulate in accordance with relevant 5    State and federal laws and shall be disbursed to the child 6    or the child's guardian or to the issuing agency.7    (r) The Department shall promulgate regulations 8encouraging all adoption agencies to voluntarily forward to 9the Department or its agent names and addresses of all persons 10who have applied for and have been approved for adoption of a 11hard-to-place child or child with a disability and the names 12of such children who have not been placed for adoption. A list 13of such names and addresses shall be maintained by the 14Department or its agent, and coded lists which maintain the 15confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 16of the child shall be made available, without charge, to every 17adoption agency in the State to assist the agencies in placing 18such children for adoption. The Department may delegate to an 19agent its duty to maintain and make available such lists. The 20Department shall ensure that such agent maintains the 21confidentiality of the person seeking to adopt the child and 22of the child.23    (s) The Department of Children and Family Services may 24establish and implement a program to reimburse caregivers 25licensed, certified, or otherwise approved by the Department 26of Children and Family Services for damages sustained by the   HB0871 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1caregivers as a result of the malicious or negligent acts of 2children placed by the Department, as well as providing third 3party coverage for such caregivers with regard to actions of 4children placed by the Department to other individuals. Such 5coverage will be secondary to the caregiver's liability 6insurance policy, if applicable. The program shall be funded 7through appropriations from the General Revenue Fund, 8specifically designated for such purposes.9    (t) The Department shall perform home studies and 10investigations and shall exercise supervision over visitation 11as ordered by a court pursuant to the Illinois Marriage and 12Dissolution of Marriage Act or the Adoption Act only if:13        (1) an order entered by an Illinois court specifically 14    directs the Department to perform such services; and15        (2) the court has ordered one or both of the parties to 16    the proceeding to reimburse the Department for its 17    reasonable costs for providing such services in accordance 18    with Department rules, or has determined that neither 19    party is financially able to pay.20    The Department shall provide written notification to the 21court of the specific arrangements for supervised visitation 22and projected monthly costs within 60 days of the court order. 23The Department shall send to the court information related to 24the costs incurred except in cases where the court has 25determined the parties are financially unable to pay. The 26court may order additional periodic reports as appropriate.  HB0871 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    (u) In addition to other information that must be 2provided, whenever the Department places a child with a 3prospective adoptive parent or parents, in a licensed foster 4home, group home, or child care institution, in a relative 5home, or in a certified relative caregiver home, the 6Department shall provide to the caregiver, appropriate 7facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or parents:8        (1) available detailed information concerning the 9    child's educational and health history, copies of 10    immunization records (including insurance and medical card 11    information), a history of the child's previous 12    placements, if any, and reasons for placement changes 13    excluding any information that identifies or reveals the 14    location of any previous caregiver or adoptive parents;15        (2) a copy of the child's portion of the client 16    service plan, including any visitation arrangement, and 17    all amendments or revisions to it as related to the child; 18    and19        (3) information containing details of the child's 20    individualized educational plan when the child is 21    receiving special education services.22    The caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective 23adoptive parent or parents, shall be informed of any known 24social or behavioral information (including, but not limited 25to, criminal background, fire setting, perpetuation of sexual 26abuse, destructive behavior, and substance abuse) necessary to   HB0871 Enrolled- 60 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1care for and safeguard the children to be placed or currently 2in the home or setting. The Department may prepare a written 3summary of the information required by this paragraph, which 4may be provided to the caregiver, appropriate facility staff, 5or prospective adoptive parent in advance of a placement. The 6caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 7parent may review the supporting documents in the child's file 8in the presence of casework staff. In the case of an emergency 9placement, casework staff shall at least provide known 10information verbally, if necessary, and must subsequently 11provide the information in writing as required by this 12subsection. 13    The information described in this subsection shall be 14provided in writing. In the case of emergency placements when 15time does not allow prior review, preparation, and collection 16of written information, the Department shall provide such 17information as it becomes available. Within 10 business days 18after placement, the Department shall obtain from the 19caregiver, appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive 20parent or parents a signed verification of receipt of the 21information provided. Within 10 business days after placement, 22the Department shall provide to the child's guardian ad litem 23a copy of the information provided to the caregiver, 24appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or 25parents. The information provided to the caregiver, 26appropriate facility staff, or prospective adoptive parent or   HB0871 Enrolled- 61 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1parents shall be reviewed and approved regarding accuracy at 2the supervisory level. 3    (u-5) Beginning July 1, 2025, certified relative caregiver 4homes under Section 3.4 of the Child Care Act of 1969 shall be 5eligible to receive foster care maintenance payments from the 6Department in an amount no less than payments made to licensed 7foster family homes. Beginning July 1, 2025, relative homes 8providing care to a child placed by the Department that are not 9a certified relative caregiver home under Section 3.4 of the 10Child Care Act of 1969 or a licensed foster family home shall 11be eligible to receive payments from the Department in an 12amount no less 90% of the payments made to licensed foster 13family homes and certified relative caregiver homes.14    (u-6) To assist relative and certified relative 15caregivers, no later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall 16adopt rules to implement a relative support program, as 17follows: 18        (1) For relative and certified relative caregivers, 19    the Department is authorized to reimburse or prepay 20    reasonable expenditures to remedy home conditions 21    necessary to fulfill the home safety-related requirements 22    of relative caregiver homes. 23        (2) The Department may provide short-term emergency 24    funds to relative and certified relative caregiver homes 25    experiencing extreme hardships due to the difficulty and 26    stress associated with adding youth in care as new   HB0871 Enrolled- 62 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    household members. 2        (3) Consistent with federal law, the Department shall 3    include in any State Plan made in accordance with the 4    Adoption Assistance and Child Welfare Act of 1980, Titles 5    IV-E and XIX of the Social Security Act, and any other 6    applicable federal laws the provision of kinship navigator 7    program services. The Department shall apply for and 8    administer all relevant federal aid in accordance with 9    law. Federal funds acquired for the kinship navigator 10    program shall be used for the development, implementation, 11    and operation of kinship navigator program services. The 12    kinship navigator program services may provide 13    information, referral services, support, and assistance to 14    relative and certified relative caregivers of youth in 15    care to address their unique needs and challenges. Until 16    the Department is approved to receive federal funds for 17    these purposes, the Department shall publicly post on the 18    Department's website semi-annual updates regarding the 19    Department's progress in pursuing federal funding. 20    Whenever the Department publicly posts these updates on 21    its website, the Department shall notify the General 22    Assembly through the General Assembly's designee. 23    (u-7) To support finding permanency for children through 24subsidized guardianship and adoption and to prevent disruption 25in guardianship and adoptive placements, the Department shall 26establish and maintain accessible subsidized guardianship and   HB0871 Enrolled- 63 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1adoption support services for all children under 18 years of 2age placed in guardianship or adoption who, immediately 3preceding the guardianship or adoption, were in the custody or 4guardianship of the Department under Article II of the 5Juvenile Court Act of 1987.6    The Department shall establish and maintain a toll-free 7number to respond to requests from the public about its 8subsidized guardianship and adoption support services under 9this subsection and shall staff the toll-free number so that 10calls are answered on a timely basis, but in no event more than 11one business day after the receipt of a request. These 12requests from the public may be made anonymously. To meet this 13obligation, the Department may utilize the same toll-free 14number the Department operates to respond to post-adoption 15requests under subsection (b-5) of Section 18.9 of the 16Adoption Act. The Department shall publicize information about 17the Department's subsidized guardianship support services and 18toll-free number as follows:19        (1) it shall post information on the Department's 20    website;21        (2) it shall provide the information to every licensed 22    child welfare agency and any entity providing subsidized 23    guardianship support services in Illinois courts;24        (3) it shall reference such information in the 25    materials the Department provides to caregivers pursuing 26    subsidized guardianship to inform them of their rights and   HB0871 Enrolled- 64 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    responsibilities under the Child Care Act of 1969 and this 2    Act;3        (4) it shall provide the information, including the 4    Department's Post Adoption and Guardianship Services 5    booklet, to eligible caregivers as part of its 6    guardianship training and at the time they are presented 7    with the Permanency Commitment form;8        (5) it shall include, in each annual notification 9    letter mailed to subsidized guardians, a short, 2-sided 10    flier or news bulletin in plain language that describes 11    access to post-guardianship services, how to access 12    services under the Family Support Program, formerly known 13    as the Individual Care Grant Program, the webpage address 14    to the Post Adoption and Guardianship Services booklet, 15    information on how to request that a copy of the booklet be 16    mailed; and17        (6) it shall ensure that kinship navigator programs of 18    this State, when established, have this information to 19    include in materials the programs provide to caregivers.20    No later than July 1, 2026, the Department shall provide a 21mechanism for the public to make information requests by 22electronic means. 23    The Department shall review and update annually all 24information relating to its subsidized guardianship support 25services, including its Post Adoption and Guardianship 26Services booklet, to include updated information on Family   HB0871 Enrolled- 65 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1Support Program services eligibility and subsidized 2guardianship support services that are available through the 3medical assistance program established under Article V of the 4Illinois Public Aid Code or any other State program for mental 5health services. The Department and the Department of 6Healthcare and Family Services shall coordinate their efforts 7in the development of these resources.8    Every licensed child welfare agency and any entity 9providing kinship navigator programs funded by the Department 10shall provide the Department's website address and link to the 11Department's subsidized guardianship support services 12information set forth in subsection (d), including the 13Department's toll-free number, to every relative who is or 14will be providing guardianship placement for a child placed by 15the Department.16    (v) The Department shall access criminal history record 17information as defined in the Illinois Uniform Conviction 18Information Act and information maintained in the adjudicatory 19and dispositional record system as defined in Section 2605-355 20of the Illinois State Police Law if the Department determines 21the information is necessary to perform its duties under the 22Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, the Child Care Act 23of 1969, and the Children and Family Services Act. The 24Department shall provide for interactive computerized 25communication and processing equipment that permits direct 26on-line communication with the Illinois State Police's central   HB0871 Enrolled- 66 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1criminal history data repository. The Department shall comply 2with all certification requirements and provide certified 3operators who have been trained by personnel from the Illinois 4State Police. In addition, one Office of the Inspector General 5investigator shall have training in the use of the criminal 6history information access system and have access to the 7terminal. The Department of Children and Family Services and 8its employees shall abide by rules and regulations established 9by the Illinois State Police relating to the access and 10dissemination of this information.11    (v-1) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 12with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall conduct 13a criminal records background check of the prospective foster 14or adoptive parent, including fingerprint-based checks of 15national crime information databases. Final approval for 16placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals a 17felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for spousal 18abuse, for a crime against children, or for a crime involving 19violence, including human trafficking, sex trafficking, rape, 20sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other physical 21assault or battery, or if there is a felony conviction for 22physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense committed 23within the past 5 years.24    (v-2) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 25with a foster or adoptive parent, the Department shall check 26its child abuse and neglect registry for information   HB0871 Enrolled- 67 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1concerning prospective foster and adoptive parents, and any 2adult living in the home. If any prospective foster or 3adoptive parent or other adult living in the home has resided 4in another state in the preceding 5 years, the Department 5shall request a check of that other state's child abuse and 6neglect registry. 7    (v-3) Prior to the final approval of final placement of a 8related child in a certified relative caregiver home as 9defined in Section 2.37 of the Child Care Act of 1969, the 10Department shall ensure that the background screening meets 11the standards required under subsection (c) of Section 3.4 of 12the Child Care Act of 1969. 13    (v-4) Prior to final approval for placement of a child 14with a relative, as defined in Section 4d of this Act, who is 15not a licensed foster parent, has declined to seek approval to 16be a certified relative caregiver, or was denied approval as a 17certified relative caregiver, the Department shall: 18        (i) check the child abuse and neglect registry for 19    information concerning the prospective relative caregiver 20    and any other adult living in the home. If any prospective 21    relative caregiver or other adult living in the home has 22    resided in another state in the preceding 5 years, the 23    Department shall request a check of that other state's 24    child abuse and neglect registry; and 25        (ii) conduct a criminal records background check of 26    the prospective relative caregiver and all other adults   HB0871 Enrolled- 68 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    living in the home, including fingerprint-based checks of 2    national crime information databases. Final approval for 3    placement shall not be granted if the record check reveals 4    a felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for 5    spousal abuse, for a crime against children, or for a 6    crime involving violence, including human trafficking, sex 7    trafficking, rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not 8    including other physical assault or battery, or if there 9    is a felony conviction for physical assault, battery, or a 10    drug-related offense committed within the past 5 years; 11    provided however, that the Department is empowered to 12    grant a waiver as the Department may provide by rule, and 13    the Department approves the request for the waiver based 14    on a comprehensive evaluation of the caregiver and 15    household members and the conditions relating to the 16    safety of the placement.17    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt 18rules or revise existing rules to effectuate the changes made 19to this subsection (v-4). The rules shall outline the 20essential elements of each form used in the implementation and 21enforcement of the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 22103rd General Assembly. 23    (w) (Blank).24    (x) The Department shall conduct annual credit history 25checks to determine the financial history of children placed 26under its guardianship pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of   HB0871 Enrolled- 69 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b11987. The Department shall conduct such credit checks starting 2when a youth in care turns 12 years old and each year 3thereafter for the duration of the guardianship as terminated 4pursuant to the Juvenile Court Act of 1987. The Department 5shall determine if financial exploitation of the child's 6personal information has occurred. If financial exploitation 7appears to have taken place or is presently ongoing, the 8Department shall notify the proper law enforcement agency, the 9proper State's Attorney, or the Attorney General.10    (y) Beginning on July 22, 2010 (the effective date of 11Public Act 96-1189), a child with a disability who receives 12residential and educational services from the Department shall 13be eligible to receive transition services in accordance with 14Article 14 of the School Code from the age of 14.5 through age 1521, inclusive, notwithstanding the child's residential 16services arrangement. For purposes of this subsection, "child 17with a disability" means a child with a disability as defined 18by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education 19Improvement Act of 2004. 20    (z) The Department shall access criminal history record 21information as defined as "background information" in this 22subsection and criminal history record information as defined 23in the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act for each 24Department employee or Department applicant. Each Department 25employee or Department applicant shall submit the employee's 26or applicant's fingerprints to the Illinois State Police in   HB0871 Enrolled- 70 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1the form and manner prescribed by the Illinois State Police. 2These fingerprints shall be checked against the fingerprint 3records now and hereafter filed in the Illinois State Police 4and the Federal Bureau of Investigation criminal history 5records databases. The Illinois State Police shall charge a 6fee for conducting the criminal history record check, which 7shall be deposited into the State Police Services Fund and 8shall not exceed the actual cost of the record check. The 9Illinois State Police shall furnish, pursuant to positive 10identification, all Illinois conviction information to the 11Department of Children and Family Services. 12    For purposes of this subsection: 13    "Background information" means all of the following: 14        (i) Upon the request of the Department of Children and 15    Family Services, conviction information obtained from the 16    Illinois State Police as a result of a fingerprint-based 17    criminal history records check of the Illinois criminal 18    history records database and the Federal Bureau of 19    Investigation criminal history records database concerning 20    a Department employee or Department applicant. 21        (ii) Information obtained by the Department of 22    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 23    the Illinois State Police's Sex Offender Database, as 24    authorized by Section 120 of the Sex Offender Community 25    Notification Law, concerning a Department employee or 26    Department applicant.   HB0871 Enrolled- 71 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        (iii) Information obtained by the Department of 2    Children and Family Services after performing a check of 3    the Child Abuse and Neglect Tracking System (CANTS) 4    operated and maintained by the Department. 5    "Department employee" means a full-time or temporary 6employee coded or certified within the State of Illinois 7Personnel System. 8    "Department applicant" means an individual who has 9conditional Department full-time or part-time work, a 10contractor, an individual used to replace or supplement staff, 11an academic intern, a volunteer in Department offices or on 12Department contracts, a work-study student, an individual or 13entity licensed by the Department, or an unlicensed service 14provider who works as a condition of a contract or an agreement 15and whose work may bring the unlicensed service provider into 16contact with Department clients or client records. 17    (aa) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 18Act of the 104th General Assembly are declarative of existing 19law and are not a new enactment. 20(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-1014, eff. 5-27-22; 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-50, eff. 221-1-24; 103-546, eff. 8-11-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-1061, 23eff. 7-1-25.) 24    Section 10. The Child Care Act of 1969 is amended by 25changing Section 3.4 as follows:   HB0871 Enrolled- 72 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    (225 ILCS 10/3.4)2    (This Section may contain text from a Public Act with a 3delayed effective date)4    Sec. 3.4. Standards for certified relative caregiver 5homes.6    (a) No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt 7rules outlining the standards for certified relative caregiver 8homes, which are reasonably in accordance with the national 9consortium recommendations and federal law and rules, and 10consistent with the requirements of this Act. The standards 11for certified relative caregiver homes shall: (i) be different 12from licensing standards used for non-relative foster family 13homes under Section 4; (ii) align with the recommendation of 14the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services' 15Administration for Children and Families for implementation of 16Section 471(a)(10), 471(a)(11), and 471(a)(20) and Section 474 17of Title IV-E of the Social Security Act; (iii) be no more 18restrictive than, and reasonably in accordance with, national 19consortium recommendations; and (iv) address background 20screening for caregivers and other household residents and 21assessing home safety and caregiver capacity to meet the 22identified child's needs.23    A guiding premise for certified relative caregiver home 24standards is that foster care maintenance payments for every 25relative, starting upon placement, regardless of federal   HB0871 Enrolled- 73 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1reimbursement, are critical to ensure that the basic needs and 2well-being of all children in relative care are being met. If 3an agency places a child in the care of a relative, the 4relative must immediately be provided with adequate support to 5care for that child. The Department shall review foster care 6maintenance payments to ensure that children receive the same 7amount of foster care maintenance payments whether placed in a 8certified relative caregiver home or a licensed foster family 9home. 10    In developing rules, the Department shall solicit and 11incorporate feedback from relative caregivers. No later than 1260 days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 13103rd General Assembly, the Department shall begin soliciting 14input from relatives who are currently or have recently been 15caregivers to youth in care to develop the rules and 16procedures to implement the requirements of this Section. The 17Department shall solicit this input in a manner convenient for 18caregivers to participate, including without limitation, 19in-person convenings at after hours and weekend venues, 20locations that provide child care, and modalities that are 21accessible and welcoming to new and experienced relative 22caregivers from all regions of the State. The rules shall 23outline the essential elements of each form used in the 24implementation and enforcement of the provisions of this 25amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly. 26    (b) In order to assess whether standards are met for a   HB0871 Enrolled- 74 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1certified relative caregiver home under this Section, the 2Department or a licensed child welfare agency shall: 3        (1) complete the home safety and needs assessment and 4    identify and provide any necessary concrete goods or 5    safety modifications to assist the prospective certified 6    relative caregiver in meeting the needs of the specific 7    child or children being placed by the Department, in a 8    manner consistent with Department rule;9        (2) assess the ability of the prospective certified 10    relative caregiver to care for the physical, emotional, 11    medical, and educational needs of the specific child or 12    children being placed by the Department using the protocol 13    and form provided through national consortium 14    recommendations; and15        (3) using the standard background check form 16    established by rule, complete a background check for each 17    person seeking certified relative caregiver approval and 18    any other adults living in the home as required under this 19    Section. 20    (c) The Department or a licensed child welfare agency 21shall conduct the following background screening investigation 22for every prospective certified relative caregiver and adult 23resident living in the home:24        (1) a name-based State, local, or tribal criminal 25    background check, and as soon as reasonably possible, 26    initiate a fingerprint-based background check;  HB0871 Enrolled- 75 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1        (2) a review of this State's Central Registry and 2    registries of any state in which an adult household member 3    has resided in the last 5 years, if applicable to 4    determine if the person has been determined to be a 5    perpetrator in an indicated report of child abuse or 6    neglect; and7        (3) a review of the sex offender registry. 8    No home may be a certified relative caregiver home if any 9prospective caregivers or adult residents in the home refuse 10to authorize a background screening investigation as required 11by this Section. Only information and standards that bear a 12reasonable and rational relation to the caregiving capacity of 13the certified relative caregiver and adult member of the 14household and overall safety provided by residents of that 15home shall be used by the Department or licensed child welfare 16agency. 17    In approving a certified relative caregiver home in 18accordance with this Section, if an adult has a criminal 19record, the Department or licensed child welfare agency shall 20thoroughly investigate and evaluate the criminal history of 21the adult and, in so doing, include an assessment of the 22adult's character and, in the case of the prospective 23certified relative caregiver, the impact that the criminal 24history has on the prospective certified relative caregiver's 25ability to parent the child; the investigation should consider 26the type of crime, the number of crimes, the nature of the   HB0871 Enrolled- 76 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1offense, the age of the person at the time of the crime, the 2length of time that has elapsed since the last conviction, the 3relationship of the crime to the ability to care for children, 4the role that adult will have with the child, and any evidence 5of rehabilitation. In accordance with federal law, a home 6shall not be approved if the record of the prospective 7certified relative caregiver's background screening reveals: 8(i) a felony conviction for child abuse or neglect, for 9spousal abuse, for a crime against children crimes against a 10child, including child pornography, or for a crime involving 11violence, including human trafficking, sex trafficking, of 12rape, sexual assault, or homicide, but not including other 13physical assault or battery; or (ii) a felony conviction in 14the last 5 years for physical assault, battery, or a 15drug-related offense. 16    If the Department is contemplating denying approval of a 17certified relative caregiver home, the Department shall 18provide a written notice in the prospective certified relative 19caregiver's primary language to each prospective certified 20relative caregiver before the Department takes final action to 21deny approval of the home. This written notice shall include 22the specific reason or reasons the Department is considering 23denial, list actions prospective certified relative caregivers 24can take, if any, to remedy such conditions and the timeframes 25in which such actions would need to be completed, explain 26reasonable supports that the Department can provide to assist   HB0871 Enrolled- 77 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1the prospective certified relative caregivers in taking 2remedial actions and how the prospective certified relative 3caregivers can request such assistance, and provide the 4recourse prospective certified relative caregivers can seek to 5resolve disputes about the Department's findings. The 6Department shall provide prospective certified relative 7caregivers reasonable opportunity pursuant to rulemaking to 8cure any remediable deficiencies that the Department 9identified before taking final action to deny approval of a 10certified relative caregiver home. 11    If conditions have not been remedied after a reasonable 12opportunity and assistance to cure identified deficiencies has 13been provided, the Department shall provide a final written 14notice explaining the reasons for denying the certified 15relative caregiver home approval and the reconsideration 16process to review the decision to deny certification. The 17Department shall not prohibit a prospective certified relative 18caregiver from being reconsidered for approval if the 19prospective certified relative caregivers are able to 20demonstrate a change in circumstances that improves deficient 21conditions. 22    Documentation that a certified relative caregiver home 23meets the required standards may be filed on behalf of such 24homes by a licensed child welfare agency, by a State agency 25authorized to place children in foster care, or by 26out-of-state agencies approved by the Department to place   HB0871 Enrolled- 78 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1children in this State. For documentation on behalf of a home 2in which specific children are placed by and remain under 3supervision of the applicant agency, such agency shall 4document that the certified relative caregiver home, 5responsible for the care of related specific children therein, 6was found to be in reasonable compliance with standards 7prescribed by the Department for certified relative caregiver 8homes under this Section. Certification is applicable to one 9or more related children and documentation for certification 10shall indicate the specific child or children who would be 11eligible for placement in this certified relative caregiver 12home. 13    Information concerning criminal convictions of prospective 14certified relative caregivers and adult residents of a 15prospective certified relative caregiver home investigated 16under this Section, including the source of the information, 17State conviction information provided by the Illinois State 18Police, and any conclusions or recommendations derived from 19the information, shall be offered to the prospective certified 20relative caregivers and adult residents of a prospective 21certified relative caregiver home, and provided, upon request, 22to such persons prior to final action by the Department in the 23certified relative caregiver home approval process. 24    Any information concerning criminal charges or the 25disposition of such criminal charges obtained by the 26Department shall be confidential and may not be transmitted   HB0871 Enrolled- 79 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1outside the Department, except as required or permitted by 2State or federal law, and may not be transmitted to anyone 3within the Department except as needed for the purpose of 4evaluating standards for a certified relative caregiver home 5or for evaluating the placement of a specific child in the 6home. Information concerning a prospective certified relative 7caregiver or an adult resident of a prospective certified 8relative caregiver home obtained by the Department for the 9purposes of this Section shall be confidential and exempt from 10public inspection and copying as provided under Section 7 of 11the Freedom of Information Act, and such information shall not 12be transmitted outside the Department, except as required or 13authorized by State or federal law, including applicable 14provisions in the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act, 15and shall not be transmitted to anyone within the Department 16except as provided in the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting 17Act, and shall not be transmitted to anyone within the 18Department except as needed for the purposes of evaluating 19homes. Any employee of the Department, the Illinois State 20Police, or a licensed child welfare agency receiving 21confidential information under this Section who gives or 22causes to be given any confidential information concerning any 23criminal convictions or child abuse or neglect reports 24involving a prospective certified relative caregiver or an 25adult resident of a prospective certified relative caregiver 26home shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor unless release of   HB0871 Enrolled- 80 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1such information is authorized by this Section or Section 11.1 2of the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act. 3    The Department shall permit, but shall not require, a 4prospective certified relative caregiver who does not yet have 5eligible children placed by the Department in the relative's 6home to commence the process to become a certified relative 7caregiver home for a particular identified child under this 8Section before a child is placed by the Department if the 9prospective certified relative caregiver prefers to begin this 10process in advance of the identified child being placed. No 11later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall adopt rules 12delineating the process for re-assessing a certified relative 13caregiver home if the identified child is not placed in that 14home within 6 months of the home becoming certified.15    (d) The Department shall ensure that prospective certified 16relative caregivers are provided with assistance in completing 17the steps required for approval as a certified relative 18caregiver home, including, but not limited to, the following 19types of assistance:20        (1) completing forms together with the relative or for 21    the relative, if possible;22        (2) obtaining court records or dispositions related to 23    background checks;24        (3) accessing translation services;25        (4) using mobile fingerprinting devices in the home, 26    and if mobile devices are unavailable, providing   HB0871 Enrolled- 81 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    assistance scheduling appointments that are accessible and 2    available at times that fit the household members' 3    schedules, providing transportation and child care to 4    allow the household members to complete fingerprinting 5    appointments, and contracting with community-based 6    fingerprinting locations that offer evening and weekend 7    appointments;8        (5) reimbursement or advance payment for the 9    prospective certified relative caregiver to help with 10    reasonable home maintenance to resolve critical safety 11    issues in accordance with Department rulemaking; and12        (6) purchasing required safety or comfort items such 13    as a car seat or mattress.14    (e) Orientation provided to certified relative caregivers 15shall include information regarding:16        (1) caregivers' right to be heard in juvenile court 17    proceedings;18        (2) the availability of the advocacy hotline and 19    Office of the Inspector General that caregivers may use to 20    report incidents of misconduct or violation of rules by 21    Department employees, service providers, or contractors;22        (3) the Department's expectations for caregiving 23    obligations including, but not limited to, specific 24    requirements of court orders, critical incident 25    notifications and timeframes, supervision for the child's 26    age and needs, out-of-state travel, and consent   HB0871 Enrolled- 82 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1    procedures;2        (4) assistance available to the certified relative 3    caregivers, including child care, respite care, 4    transportation assistance, case management, training and 5    support groups, kinship navigator services, financial 6    assistance, and after hours and weekend 24 hours, 7 days a 7    week emergency supports, and how to access such 8    assistance;9        (5) reasonable and prudent parenting standards; and10        (6) permanency options.11    Orientation shall be provided in a setting and modality 12convenient for the residents of the certified relative 13caregiver home, which shall include the option for one-on-one 14sessions at the residence, after business hours, and in the 15primary language of the caregivers. Training opportunities 16shall be offered to the residents of the certified relative 17caregiver home, but shall not be a requirement that delays the 18certified relative caregiver home approval process from being 19completed.20    The Department or licensed child welfare agency may 21provide support groups and development opportunities for 22certified relative caregivers, and take other steps to support 23permanency, such as offering voluntary training, or concurrent 24assessments of multiple prospective certified relative 25caregivers to determine which may be best suited to provide 26long-term permanency for a particular child. However, these   HB0871 Enrolled- 83 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1support groups and development opportunities shall not be 2requirements for prospective certified relative caregiver 3homes or delay immediate placement and support to a relative 4who satisfies the standards set forth in this Section. 5    (f) All child welfare agencies serving relative and 6certified relative caregiver homes shall be required by the 7Department to have complaint policies and procedures that 8shall be provided in writing to prospective and current 9certified relative caregivers and residents of prospective and 10current certified relative caregiver homes, at the earliest 11time possible. The complaint procedure shall allow residents 12of prospective and current certified relative caregiver homes 13to submit complaints 7 days a week and complaints shall be 14reviewed by the Department within 30 days of receipt. These 15complaint procedures must be filed with the Department within 166 months after the effective date of this amendatory of the 17103rd General Assembly.18    No later than July 1, 2025, the Department shall revise 19any rules and procedures pertaining to eligibility of 20certified relative caregivers to qualify for State and federal 21subsidies and services under the guardianship and adoption 22assistance program and remove any requirements that exceed the 23federal requirements for participation in these programs or 24supports to ensure that certified relative caregiver homes are 25deemed eligible for permanency options, such as adoption or 26subsidized guardianship, if the child is unable to safely   HB0871 Enrolled- 84 -LRB104 04769 SPS 14796 b1return to the child's parents. The rules shall outline the 2essential elements of each form used in the implementation and 3enforcement of the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 4103rd General Assembly.5    The Department shall submit any necessary State plan 6amendments necessary to comply with this Section and to ensure 7Title IV-E reimbursement eligibility under Section 8671(a)(20)(A-B) of the Social Security Act can be achieved 9expediently. The Department shall differentiate expenditures 10related to certified relative caregivers from licensed care 11placements to provide clarity in expenditures of State and 12federal monies for certified relative caregiver supports.13(Source: P.A. 103-1061, eff. 7-1-25.) 14    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 15changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 16that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 17represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 18not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 19made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 20Public Act. 21    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 222025.